Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2201XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 380 Section 1. Section 10A.202, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The department is responsible for the administration of 3 the laws of this state under chapters 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 90A , 4 91A , 91C , 91D , 91E , 92 , and 95, and such other labor-services 5 duties assigned to the department or director. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.204, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. The director, in consultation with the labor 9 commissioner, shall, at the time provided by law, make an 10 annual report to the governor setting forth in appropriate 11 form the business and expense of the division and department 12 under this subchapter for the preceding year, the number 13 of remedial actions taken under chapter 89A , the number of 14 disputes or violations processed by the division or department 15 and the disposition of the disputes or violations, and other 16 matters pertaining to the division or department under this 17 subchapter which that are of public interest, together with 18 recommendations for change or amendment of the laws in this 19 chapter and chapters 88 , 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 89B , 90A , 91A , 20 91C , 91D , 91E , and 92 , and 95, and sections 85.67A and 85.68 , 21 and the recommendations, if any, shall be transmitted by the 22 governor to the first general assembly in session after the 23 report is filed. 24 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 95.1 Definitions. 25 For purposes of this chapter unless the context otherwise 26 requires: 27 1. âCovenant not to solicitâ means an agreement that is 28 entered into between an employer and an employee that does any 29 of the following: 30 a. Restricts the employee from soliciting for employment the 31 employerâs employees. 32 b. Restricts the employee from soliciting, for the 33 purpose of selling products or services of any kind to, or 34 from interfering with the employerâs relationships with, the 35 -1- LSB 2201XS (3) 91 je/js 1/ 5 S.F. 380 employerâs clients, prospective clients, vendors, prospective 1 vendors, suppliers, prospective suppliers, or other business 2 relationships. 3 2. âDirectorâ means the director of the department of 4 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 5 3. âEarningsâ means the compensation, including earned 6 salary, earned bonuses, earned commissions, or any other form 7 of taxable compensation, reflected or that is expected to 8 be reflected as wages, tips, and other compensation on the 9 employeeâs internal revenue service form W-2 plus any elective 10 deferrals not reflected as wages, tips, and other compensation 11 on the employeeâs internal revenue service form W-2, such as, 12 without limitation, employee contributions to a 401(k) plan, a 13 403(b) plan, a flexible spending account, or a health savings 14 account, or commuter benefit-related deductions. 15 4. âEmployeeâ means a person licensed and employed as a 16 registered nurse or an advanced registered nurse practitioner 17 under chapter 152 or 152E. 18 5. a. âNoncompete covenantâ means an agreement between an 19 employer and an employee that is entered into that restricts 20 the employee from performing: 21 (1) Any work for another employer for a specific period of 22 time. 23 (2) Any work in a specified geographical area. 24 (3) Work for another employer that is similar to any 25 employeeâs work for the employer included as a party to the 26 agreement. 27 b. âNoncompete covenantâ also means an agreement between 28 an employer and an employee that by its terms imposes adverse 29 financial consequences on the former employee if the employee 30 engages in competitive activities after the termination of the 31 employeeâs employment with the employer. 32 c. âNoncompete covenantâ does not include any of the 33 following: 34 (1) A covenant not to solicit. 35 -2- LSB 2201XS (3) 91 je/js 2/ 5 S.F. 380 (2) A confidentiality agreement or covenant. 1 (3) A covenant or agreement prohibiting use or disclosure 2 of trade secrets or inventions. 3 (4) Invention assignment agreements or covenants. 4 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 95.2 Impermissible noncompete 5 covenants. 6 The following noncompete covenants are void and violate this 7 chapter: 8 1. A noncompete covenant within an employment agreement 9 or contract in which an employeeâs earnings are less than one 10 hundred fifty percent of the state or federal minimum wage. 11 2. A noncompete covenant with an employee unless the 12 employer can show beyond a preponderance of the evidence that 13 there is a clear and inherent risk of unfair competition 14 absent the noncompete covenant and the noncompete covenant 15 was narrowly tailored to address the risk in restrictions to 16 geographic area and duration of the noncompete covenant. 17 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 95.3 Exceptions. 18 1. A covenant or agreement entered into by a person that 19 sells the goodwill of a business and the personâs partners, 20 members, or shareholders may agree with the buyer to refrain 21 from carrying on a similar business within a reasonable 22 geographic area and for a reasonable length of time, if the 23 buyer or any person deriving title to the goodwill from the 24 buyer carries on a like business in that area. 25 2. A covenant or agreement entered into by partners, 26 members, or shareholders, upon or in anticipation of a 27 dissolution of a partnership, limited liability company, or 28 corporation; upon or in anticipation of a dissociation of a 29 partner or member; or as part of an agreement addressing the 30 dissociation or sale of a partner, member, or shareholderâs 31 ownership interest, may agree that all or any number of them 32 will not carry on a similar business within a reasonable 33 geographic area where the partnership, limited liability 34 company, or corporation business has been transacted, or within 35 -3- LSB 2201XS (3) 91 je/js 3/ 5 S.F. 380 a specified part of the area. 1 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 95.4 Remedies. 2 1. In addition to any remedies available under any agreement 3 between the employer and the employee or under any other 4 statute, in a civil action, if an employer is found to have 5 violated this chapter, the employee shall recover from the 6 employer all reasonable attorney fees regarding an attempt to 7 enforce a noncompete covenant, court costs, lost wages, and, 8 at the discretion of the court, liquidated damages of up to 9 triple the amount of lost wages for willful violations of this 10 chapter. 11 2. An employer found to have violated this chapter may be 12 fined a five thousand dollar civil penalty per violation by 13 the director. Penalties shall be paid to the director and 14 transferred to the general fund. 15 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 95.5 Rules. 16 The director shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 17 administer and enforce this chapter. 18 Sec. 8. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to covenants not 19 to compete entered into on or after the effective date of this 20 Act. 21